Louisiana, session 2026, SB247.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:1602(A)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1602. Issuance of charter by the secretary of state; organization and operations;
authority to receive public funds; liability
A.(1) * * *
(3) Immediately upon issuance of the charter by the secretary of state, the
parish voluntary council on the aging will be authorized to receive public funds from
any governmental or political subdivision. Such funds shall be subject to audit by the
legislative auditor or his duly authorized representative. Each parish voluntary
council on the aging shall submit bank statements to the legislative auditor on
a monthly basis. The deadline to submit bank statements shall be on the last day
of each month.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-602 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 247
* * *